Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 154B Economic and Jobs Development

154B.100.
Definitions. [Renumbered.]

154B.102.
Creation of the corporation — Purpose — Interim board of directors. [Renumbered.]

154B.104.
Corporation membership — Intergovernmental agreement — Amendment of articles of agreement. [Renumbered.]

154B.106.
Board of directors — Terms of office — Vacancies. [Renumbered.]

154B.108.
Removal of members — Meetings — Officers. [Renumbered.]

154B.110.
Powers and authority of corporation. [Renumbered.]

154B.112.
Executive committee — Membership — Powers and duties — Meetings — Expenses. [Renumbered.]

154B.114.
Bonds. [Renumbered.]

154B.116.
East Kentucky economic development fund. [Renumbered.]

154B.118.
Construction of KRS 154B.100 to 154B.150. [Renumbered.]

154B.120.
Bonds payable from revenue and assets. [Renumbered.]

154B.122.
Negotiability of obligations of the corporation. [Renumbered.]

154B.124.
Obligations are authorized investments. [Renumbered.]

154B.126.
Limitations on liability of corporate members or officers. [Renumbered.]

154B.128.
Tax-exempt status. [Renumbered.]

154B.130.
Disclosure of conflict of interest of member, officer, or employee of the corporation. [Renumbered.]

154B.132.
Disposition of corporation assets upon termination or dissolution of the corporation. [Renumbered.]

154B.134.
Annual report — Annual audit of the corporation. [Renumbered.]

154B.150.
Title. [Renumbered.]